Maryland, session 2025, SB0663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–913.
(a) (1) On or before January 1 of each calendar year, the Comptroller shall
publish the maximum income eligibility for the earned income tax credit under § 10–704 of
this title for the calendar year.
(2) The Comptroller shall prepare a notice that meets the requirements of
subsection (b) of this section and [mail] PROVIDE the notice, BY MAIL OR ELECTRONIC
MEANS, to all employers in the State.
(b) (1) On or before December 31 of each calendar year, an employer shall
provide electronic or written notice to an employee who may be eligible for the earned
income tax credit under § 10–704 of this title that:
(i) the employee may be eligible for the federal earned income tax
credit under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(ii) the employee may be eligible for the earned income tax credit
under § 10–704 of this title.
(2) An employer may provide the notice required under this subsection to:
(i) all employees; or
– 1 –

Ch. 630 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) employees with wages that are less than or equal to the
maximum income eligibility published under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) An employee may not pursue a private cause of action against an employer for
the employer’s failure to provide the notice required under subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –